North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 24. The Legislative Study Commission on Children and Youth. [Repealed]

§§ 120-215 through 120-220.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.5(b), effective June 24, 2011.

History.

S. 120-215; 1997-390, s. 11; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.5(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-216; 1997-390, s. 11; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(b); 1999-423, s. 5; 2000-137, s. 4(u); 2007-323, s. 10.10(i); repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.5(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-217; 1997-390, s. 11; 1997-443, ss. 11A-120, 11A-121, 11A-122; 1997-483, s. 3.1; 2007-323, s. 10.10(i); 2009-142, s. 2; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.5(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-218; 1997-390, s. 11; 2007-323, s. 10.10(i); repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.5(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-219; 1997-390, s. 11; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.5(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-220; 1997-390, s. 11; 2007-323, s. 10.10(i); repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.5(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-221; 2007-323, s. 10.10(i); repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.5(b), effective June 24, 2011.

§ 120-221.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-266, s. 1.19(a), effective July 1, 2011, and Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.5(b), effective June 24, 2011.

History.

2007-323, s. 10.10(i); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.19(a), effective July 1, 2011, and 2011-291, s. 1.5(b), effective June 24, 2011.

§§ 120-222 through 120-224.

Reserved for future codification purposes.